Wyoming, session 2026, HB0151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-4-201(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xv), (c)(i), (iii), (iv) and by creating new
paragraphs (vi) through (viii), 16-4-202(d)(i),
16-4-203(f)(i)(intro), 16-4-204(a), (d), (e) and by
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
creating new subsections (f) and (g) and 16-4-205 are
amended to read:

16-4-201. Definitions; short title; designation of
ombudsman; duties of ombudsman.

(a) As used in this act:

(xv) "Public records request" means a single
inquiry for one (1) or more public records that are
reasonably related in subject matter and scope.

(c) The governor shall designate an ombudsman for
purposes of this act. The ombudsman shall:

(i) Receive and investigate complaints as
provided under this act;

(iii) Keep confidential all records submitted by
a governmental entity for the purpose of in-camera review;

(iv) Provide uniform interpretation and training
on the ombudsman's role, and recommendations and duties
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
under this act to governmental entities and the general
public;

(vi) Conduct in-camera review of any public
record to which access has been denied to determine whether
the denial is consistent with law;

(vii) Issue orders directing a governmental
entity to comply with the Wyoming Public Records Act.
Orders issued under this paragraph may direct the release
of records, provide for the waiver or refund of fees or
direct any other action necessary to ensure compliance with
the act;

(viii) Take reasonable action to support the
ombudsman's conduct in any legal proceeding.

16-4-202. Right of inspection; rules and regulations;
unavailability; training.

(d) If a public record exists primarily or solely in
an electronic format, the custodian of the record shall so
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
inform the requester. Electronic record inspection and
copying shall be subject to the following:

(i) The reasonable costs of producing a copy of
the public record shall be borne by the party making the
request. Subject to W.S. 16-4-204(f), the costs may
include the cost of producing a copy of the public record
and the cost of constructing the record, including the cost
of programming and computer services;

16-4-203. Right of inspection; grounds for denial;
access of news media; order permitting or restricting
disclosure; attorneys' fees available; exceptions.

(f) Any person aggrieved by the failure of a
governmental entity to release records on the specified
date mutually agreed upon pursuant to W.S. 16-4-202(c)(iv)
or by the failure of a governmental entity to comply with
an order of the ombudsman pursuant to W.S. 16-4-201(c)(vii)
or 16-4-202(c)(v) may:

(i) Apply to the district court of the district
wherein the record is found for an order to direct the
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
custodian of the record to show cause why he should not
permit the inspection of the record and to compel
production of the record if applicable. An order issued by
the district court under this paragraph may waive any fees
charged by the state governmental entity and shall award
attorneys' fees and court costs to the prevailing
applicant;

16-4-204. Right of inspection; copies, printouts or
photographs; fees.

(a) In all cases in which a person has the right to
inspect and copy any public records he may request that he
be furnished copies, printouts or photographs for a
reasonable fee to be set by the official custodian subject
to subsection (f) of this section. Where fees for certified
copies or other copies, printouts or photographs of the
record are specifically prescribed by law, the specific
fees shall apply. Nothing in this section shall be
construed as authorizing a fee to be charged as a condition
of making a public record available for inspection.

HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
(d) Subject to subsections (f) and (g) of this
section, all state agencies may adopt rules and regulations
pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act
establishing reasonable fees and charges that may be
assessed for the costs and services set forth in this
section.

(e) Subject to subsections (f) and (g) of this
section, the department of administration and information
shall adopt uniform rules for the use of state agencies
establishing procedures, fees, costs and charges for
inspection, copies and production of public records under
W.S. 16-4-202(d)(i), 16-4-203(h)(i) and 16-4-204.

(f) Fees for copies of public records shall not
exceed the following amounts:

(i) For electronic records provided by
electronic means, including email or a publicly accessible
download link: zero dollars ($0.00);

HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
(ii) For electronic records provided on a data
storage device supplied by the governmental entity: a flat
fee of twenty dollars ($20.00);

(iii) For paper copies: fifteen cents ($0.15)
per page up to six hundred sixty-six (666) pages and five
cents ($0.05) for each additional page over six hundred
sixty-six (666);

(iv) For records provided by mail: other fees
applicable under this section plus the actual cost of
postage and shipping materials, not to exceed the rates
charged by the United States Postal Service for a
comparable shipment;

(v) A governmental entity shall not divide a
single public records request into multiple requests solely
for the purpose of assessing additional fees.

(g) No fee shall be charged for the time and labor
costs associated with locating, reviewing, redacting or
otherwise preparing a public record for inspection or
release. This prohibition does not apply to fees for
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
programming and computer services necessary to construct
electronic records as authorized under W.S. 16-4-202(d)(i).

16-4-205. Penalties; remedies.

(a) Any person who knowingly or intentionally
violates the provisions of this act is liable for a penalty
not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) of two
thousand dollars ($2,000.00). The penalty may be recovered
in a civil action and damages may be assessed by the court.

(b) Any person who has grounds to believe that a
governmental entity or political subdivision is in
violation of this act shall have the right to file a
petition for a writ of mandamus pursuant to W.S. 1-30-101
through 1-30-118 to require the governmental entity to
comply with this act and shall be awarded the fees and
costs available under W.S. 1-30-112.

(c) A governmental entity that fails to comply with a
final court order issued under this act shall be subject to
a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for
each business day of noncompliance, to be assessed by the
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
court. The daily penalty shall begin to accrue on the first
business day following the deadline for compliance
specified in the court order.

(d) In any action under this act where the court
finds that a governmental entity acted in bad faith in
denying access to public records or in failing to comply
with this act, the court may impose additional punitive
damages of not more than seven thousand five hundred
dollars ($7,500.00). For purposes of this subsection, "bad
faith" includes but is not limited to:

(i) Knowingly denying access to records that are
clearly public;

(ii) Intentionally imposing excessive or
unlawful fees to discourage requests;

(iii) Deliberately delaying the production of
records without lawful justification;

(iv) Destroying or concealing public records to
prevent disclosure.
HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403

(e) All damages recovered under this section shall be
paid to the person who brought the action.

Section 2. This act shall apply to public record
requests made on and after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. All agency rules authorized or required
under this act shall be promulgated or repromulgated to
comply with this act not later than July 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act shall apply to any governmental
entity as defined in W.S. 16-4-201(a)(xiii), including any
state agency, political subdivision, or other entity
subject to the Wyoming Public Records Act.

HB0151

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0403
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0151